test/src/morphology/N-sulgu_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - sulgu: # Noun 'feather / sulka' - full paradigm
     sulgu+N+Sg+Nom: sulgu
     sulgu+N+Sg+Gen: sullan
     sulgu+N+Sg+Acc: [sulgu, sullan]
     sulgu+N+Sg+Par: sulgua
     sulgu+N+Sg+Tra: sullakse
     sulgu+N+Sg+Abe: [sullatta, sullata, sullattah]
     sulgu+N+Sg+Com: sullanke
     sulgu+N+Sg+Ine: sullas
     sulgu+N+Sg+Ela: [sullaspäi, sullas]
     sulgu+N+Sg+Ill: sulgah
     sulgu+N+Sg+Ade: sullal
     sulgu+N+Sg+Abl: [sullalpäi, sullal]
     sulgu+N+Sg+All: sullale
     sulgu+N+Sg+Ess: sullannu
     sulgu+N+Sg+Ter: sullassah
     sulgu+N+Sg+Apr: sullalluo
     sulgu+N+Pl+Nom: sullat
     sulgu+N+Pl+Gen: sulgien
     sulgu+N+Pl+Acc: sullat
     sulgu+N+Pl+Par: sulgii
     sulgu+N+Pl+Tra: sullikse
     sulgu+N+Pl+Abe: [sullitta, sullita, sullittah]
     sulgu+N+Pl+Com: sulgienke
     sulgu+N+Pl+Ine: sullis
     sulgu+N+Pl+Ela: [sullispäi, sullis]
     sulgu+N+Pl+Ill: sulgih
     sulgu+N+Pl+Ade: sullil
     sulgu+N+Pl+Abl: [sullilpäi, sullil]
     sulgu+N+Pl+All: sullile
     sulgu+N+Pl+Ess: sullinnu
     sulgu+N+Pl+Ins: sullin
     sulgu+N+Pl+Apr: sulgielluo
     sulgu+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: sulgugi
     sulgu+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: sullangi
     sulgu+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [sulgugi, sullangi]
     sulgu+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: sulguagi
     sulgu+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: sullaksegi
     sulgu+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [sullattagi, sullatagi, sullattahgi]
     sulgu+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: sullankegi
     sulgu+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: sullasgi
     sulgu+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [sullaspäigi, sullasgi]
     sulgu+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: sulgahgi
     sulgu+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: sullalgi
     sulgu+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [sullalpäigi, sullalgi]
     sulgu+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: sullalegi
     sulgu+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: sullannugi
     sulgu+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: sullassahgi
     sulgu+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: sullalluogi
     sulgu+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: sullatgi
     sulgu+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: sulgiengi
     sulgu+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: sullatgi
     sulgu+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: sulgiigi
     sulgu+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: sulliksegi
     sulgu+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [sullitagi, sullittagi, sullittahgi]
     sulgu+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: sulgienkegi
     sulgu+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: sullisgi
     sulgu+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [sullispäigi, sullisgi]
     sulgu+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: sulgihgi
     sulgu+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: sullilgi
     sulgu+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [sullilpäigi, sullilgi]
     sulgu+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: sullilegi
     sulgu+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: sullinnugi
     sulgu+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: sullingi
     sulgu+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: sulgielluogi
